Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-1111
Qualified low-income community investment,
defined.

Qualified
low-income community investment means any capital or equity investment in,
or loan to, any qualified active low-income community business. With respect
to any one qualified active low-income community business, the maximum amount
of qualified low-income community investments made in such business, on a
collective basis with all of its affiliates, shall be ten million dollars
whether issued to one or several qualified community development entities.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 11.
January 1, 2012